Arkansas, session 2025, SB489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. FINDINGS AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (a) The
General Assembly finds that:
(1) Charleston School District in Charleston, Arkansas, and
Fayetteville School District in Fayetteville, Arkansas, were acknowledged as
the first school districts to desegregate their schools in the former
Confederate States of America;
(2) Following the May 17, 1954, decision of the United States
Supreme Court in Brown v. Board of Education, the school boards of
Fayetteville and Charleston voted to integrate their schools beginning in the
fall of 1954, with Fayetteville making the decision just four (4) days after
the Brown v. Board of Education opinion;
(3) On August 23, 1954, eleven (11) African-American students
*MBM189*
03/17/2025 4:27:47 PM MBM189

SB489
attended classes in Charleston with no publicity as the school board and the
superintendent persuaded the local newspaper and civic and business leaders
not to discuss their desegregation plans with out-of-town sources;
(4) When Fayetteville High School integrated on September 10,
1954, the Charleston School Board President revealed that Charleston had
peacefully integrated three (3) weeks earlier;
(5) While integration in Charleston and Fayetteville was spared
some of the problems experienced by other schools during the early days of
desegregation, the districts faced challenges such as football teams refusing
to play Charleston and Fayetteville as there were black players on the teams
and Charleston being excluded from some band competitions because of their
black band members;
(6) United States Senator Dale Bumpers, a former member of the
Charleston School Board, sponsored legislation in 1998 designating Charleston
High School as a National Commemorative Site; and
(7) It is appropriate to commemorate the historic achievement of
being the first school districts in the former Confederate States of America
to desegregate their schools by placing a monument on the State Capitol
grounds in recognition of the school districts in Charleston and
Fayetteville.
(b) It is the intent of this act to place a monument on the State
Capitol grounds in recognition of the historic desegregation of the
Charleston School District and the Fayetteville School District in 1954.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1125(e)(2), concerning the Arkansas
Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund and as amended by
Acts 2025, No. 251, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Before the expenditure of any moneys from the Arkansas
Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund for the maintenance,
repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep of any kind for a
specific monument or memorial areas on State Capitol grounds, if there is a
fund dedicated to that specific monument or memorial, the Secretary of State
shall utilize the gifts, grants, and donations made to the following funds
for the maintenance, repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep
of that specific monument or memorial:
(A) Vietnam Veterans Monument Fund;
03/17/2025 4:27:47 PM MBM189

SB489
(B) Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund;
(C) Ten Commandments Monument Display Act under § 22-3-
221;
(D) Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Fund;
(E) Arkansas Fallen Firefighters Memorial Board under §
22-3-1704; and
(F) Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Fund; and
(G) Charleston and Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial
Monument Fund.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 11, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1161. Charleston and Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial Monument
Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Charleston and Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial Monument
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from
individuals and organizations as provided under the Charleson and
Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial Monument Act, § 22-3-225, and other funds
as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting and
maintaining a suitable monument on the State Capitol grounds in recognition
of the desegregation of the Charleston and Fayetteville school districts in
1954, as provided in the Charleston and Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial
Monument Act, § 22-3-225.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 22, Chapter 3, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
22-3-225. Charleston and Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial Monument
Act.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Charleston
and Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial Monument Act”.
(b)(1) The Secretary of State shall permit and arrange for the
placement on the State Capitol grounds of a monument commemorating the
03/17/2025 4:27:47 PM MBM189

SB489
desegregation of the Charleston and Fayetteville School Districts in 1954.
(2) The monument shall be placed on the State Capitol grounds
where there are other monuments.
(3) The Secretary of State shall approve the design and site
selection for the monument through consultation with the Capitol Arts and
Grounds Commission.
(c) The Secretary of State may accept gifts, grants, and donations
from individuals and organizations to be deposited as trust funds into the
Charleston and Fayetteville Desegregation Memorial Monument Fund.



























03/17/2025 4:27:47 PM MBM189